Washington statutes.
RCW 30A.12.110

Commission, etc., for procuring loan—Penalty.

No officer, director, agent, employee or stockholder of any bank shall, directly or indirectly, receive a bonus, commission, compensation, remuneration, gift, speculative interest or gratuity of any kind from any person, firm or corporation other than the bank or as allowed by RCW 30A.12.115 for granting, procuring or endeavoring to procure, for any person, firm or corporation, any loan by or out of the funds of such bank or the purchase or sale of any securities or property for or on account of such bank or for granting or procuring permission for any person, firm or corporation to overdraw any account with such bank. Any person violating this section shall be guilty of a gross misdemeanor.

[ 2014 c 37 s 183; 1986 c 279 s 35; 1955 c 33 s 30.12.110. Prior: 1919 c 209 s 20; RRS s 3290. Formerly RCW 30.12.110.]